english.lexc
!!!english.lexc!!!

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;

LEXICON Noun

cat   Nstem;
city  Nstem;
fox   Nstem;
panic Nstem;
try   Nstem;
watch Nstem;

LEXICON Verb

beg   Vinf;
fox   Vinf;
make  Vinf;
panic Vinf;
try   Vinf;
watch Vinf;

LEXICON Nstem

+N+Sg:0   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0             #;
+V+3P+Sg:^s      #;
+V+Past:^ed      #;
+V+PastPart:^ed  #;
+V+PresPart:^ing #;
